Utah statutes.
17-18a-602.   Deputy attorneys.

(1)  The attorney may employ a deputy attorney to perform the duties of public prosecutor or civil counsel.

(2) (a)  Subject to the approval of the county attorney, the district attorney may cross deputize a county deputy attorney as a deputy district attorney.

(b)  Subject to the approval of the district attorney, the county attorney may cross deputize a deputy district attorney as a deputy county attorney.

(3)  The county attorney may specially deputize, for a limited time or limited purpose, an attorney licensed to practice law in the state and in good standing with the Utah State Bar as a deputy to assist in any public prosecutor or civil counsel duties specified in the special deputization.



Enacted by Chapter 237, 2013 General Session

